Florida, session 2026, SB1534.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 30 31 Section 1.âSection 381.0601, Florida Statutes, is amended 32 to read: 33 (Substantial rewording of section. See 34 s. 381.0601, F.S., for present text.) 35 381.0601âPatient-directed blood donations.â 36 (1)âSHORT TITLE.âThis section may be cited as the âPatient 37 Directed Blood Donation Act.â 38 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 39 (a)ââAutologous donationâ means the collection and storage 40 of blood or blood components from an individual for transfusion 41 back to the same individual. 42 (b)ââBlood bankâ means any entity licensed under state or 43 federal law to collect, process, store, or distribute human 44 blood or blood components. 45 (c)ââDirected donationâ means the collection and storage of 46 blood or blood components from a specific donor for transfusion 47 to a specifically identified patient, ordered by a licensed 48 physician. 49 (d)ââHospitalâ has the same meaning as in s. 395.002. 50 (3)âCOMPLIANCE WITH PHYSICIAN ORDERS; DUTIES OF BLOOD BANKS 51 AND HOSPITALS.â 52 (a)âA blood bank shall comply with a licensed physicianâs 53 order for an autologous or directed blood donation for a named 54 patient, subject to applicable medical suitability criteria and 55 the availability of services at that facility. 56 (b)âA hospital that facilitates blood donations or 57 contracts with a blood bank shall allow a patient who is 58 scheduled for a medical procedure to provide autologous or 59 directed donations if ordered by the patientâs licensed 60 physician, to the extent that such donations are medically 61 appropriate and logistically feasible. 62 (4)âADMINISTRATIVE FEES.â 63 (a)âA blood bank or hospital may charge a fee that is 64 reasonable and necessary to cover the administrative costs of 65 facilitating autologous and directed donations, including 66 collection, processing, testing, storage, and distribution. 67 (b)âFees authorized under this subsection may not be 68 structured in a manner that unreasonably deters medically 69 appropriate autologous or directed donations as ordered by a 70 licensed physician. 71 (5)âSAFETY AND REGULATORY COMPLIANCE.âThis section does not 72 alter or diminish any requirement under federal or state law 73 regarding donor eligibility, screening, testing, labeling, 74 storage, recordkeeping, or compatibility of blood and blood 75 components, including requirements of the United States Food and 76 Drug Administration and applicable accreditation standards. All 77 autologous and directed donations must be collected, tested, 78 stored, and transfused in accordance with such laws and 79 standards. 80 (6)âREVERSION TO GENERAL INVENTORY; EMERGENCY EXCEPTION.â 81 (a)âA unit of blood or blood component collected as an 82 autologous or directed donation for a specific patient must be 83 reserved for that patient, consistent with medical and 84 regulatory requirements, until one of the following occurs: 85 1.âThe patient no longer requires the unit; or 86 2.âThe unit is no longer medically appropriate for 87 transfusion to that patient. 88 (b)âWhen a reserved unit is no longer needed or medically 89 appropriate for the designated patient, and remains suitable for 90 transfusion, the unit may revert to general inventory and be 91 used for other patients in accordance with applicable laws and 92 standards. 93 (c)âIn a documented emergency in which an immediate 94 transfusion is necessary to prevent serious harm or death and no 95 suitable alternative unit is available, a reserved unit may be 96 released for emergency use in another patient, consistent with 97 federal and state requirements and hospital policies. 98 (7)âRULEMAKING.âThe Department of Health may adopt rules to 99 implement this section, including to provide guidance on 100 reasonable and necessary fees and any reporting or documentation 101 needed to demonstrate compliance with this section. 102 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.